Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.107

Competitive bidding—Bidder claiming error.

A low bidder on a public works project who claims error and fails to enter into a contract is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

[ 2003 c 300 s 2.]